California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(h) This section shall not apply to referrals for services that are described in and covered by Sections 139.3 and 139.31 of the Labor Code.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 890)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

650.02.

The prohibition of Section 650.01 shall not apply to or restrict any of the following:

(a) A licensee may refer a patient for a good or service otherwise prohibited by subdivision (a) of Section 650.01 if the licensee’s regular practice is located where there is no alternative provider of the service within either 25 miles or 40 minutes traveling time, via the shortest route on a paved road. If an alternative provider commences furnishing the good or service for which a patient was referred pursuant to this subdivision, the licensee shall cease referrals under this subdivision within six months of the time at which the licensee knew or should have known that the alternative provider is furnishing the good or service. A licensee who refers to or seeks consultation from an organization in which the licensee has a financial interest under this subdivision shall disclose this interest to the patient or the patient’s parents or legal guardian in writing at the time of referral.

(b) A licensee, when the licensee or his or her immediate family has one or more of the following arrangements with another licensee, a person, or an entity, is not prohibited from referring a patient to the licensee, person, or entity because of the arrangement:

(1) A loan between a licensee and the recipient of the referral, if the loan has commercially reasonable terms, bears interest at the prime rate or a higher rate that does not constitute usury, is adequately secured, and the loan terms are not affected by either party’s referral of any person or the volume of services provided by either party.

(2) A lease of space or equipment between a licensee and the recipient of the referral, if the lease is written, has commercially reasonable terms, has a fixed periodic rent payment, has a term of one year or more, and the lease payments are not affected by either party’s referral of any person or the volume of services provided by either party.

(3) Ownership of corporate investment securities, including shares, bonds, or other debt instruments that may be purchased on terms generally available to the public and that are traded on a licensed securities exchange or NASDAQ, do not base profit distributions or other transfers of value on the licensee’s referral of persons to the corporation, do not have a separate class or accounting for any persons or for any licensees who may refer persons to the corporation, and are in a corporation that had, at the end of the corporation’s most recent fiscal year, or on average during the previous three fiscal years, stockholder equity exceeding seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000).

(4) Ownership of shares in a regulated investment company as defined in Section 851(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, if the company had, at the end of the company’s most recent fiscal year, or on average during the previous three fiscal years, total assets exceeding seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000).

(5) A one-time sale or transfer of a practice or property or other financial interest between a licensee and the recipient of the referral if the sale or transfer is for commercially reasonable terms and the consideration is not affected by either party’s referral of any person or the volume of services provided by either party.

(6) A personal services arrangement between a licensee or an immediate family member of the licensee and the recipient of the referral if the arrangement meets all of the following requirements:

(A) It is set out in writing and is signed by the parties.

(B) It specifies all of the services to be provided by the licensee or an immediate family member of the licensee.

(C) The aggregate services contracted for do not exceed those that are reasonable and necessary for the legitimate business purposes of the arrangement.

(D) A person who is referred by a licensee or an immediate family member of the licensee is informed in writing of the personal services arrangement that includes information on where a person may go to file a complaint against the licensee or the immediate family member of the licensee.

(E) The term of the arrangement is for at least one year.

(F) The compensation to be paid over the term of the arrangement is set in advance, does not exceed fair market value, and is not determined in a manner that takes into account the volume or value of any referrals or other business generated between the parties.

(G) The services to be performed under the arrangement do not involve the counseling or promotion of a business arrangement or other activity that violates any state or federal law.

(c) (1) A licensee may refer a person to a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or to any facility owned or leased by a health facility, if the recipient of the referral does not compensate the licensee for the patient referral, and any equipment lease arrangement between the licensee and the referral recipient complies with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(2) Nothing shall preclude this subdivision from applying to a licensee solely because the licensee has an ownership or leasehold interest in an entire health facility or an entity that owns or leases an entire health facility.

(3) A licensee may refer a person to a health facility for any service classified as an emergency under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) A licensee may refer a person to any organization that owns or leases a health facility licensed pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code if the licensee is not compensated for the patient referral, the licensee does not receive any payment from the recipient of the referral that is based or determined on the number or value of any patient referrals, and any equipment lease arrangement between the licensee and the referral recipient complies with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). For purposes of this paragraph, the ownership may be through stock or membership, and may be represented by a parent holding company that solely owns or controls both the health facility organization and the affiliated organization.

(d) A licensee may refer a person to a nonprofit corporation that provides physician services pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code if the nonprofit corporation is controlled through membership by one or more health facilities or health facility systems and the amount of compensation or other transfer of funds from the health facility or nonprofit corporation to the licensee is fixed annually, except for adjustments caused by physicians joining or leaving the groups during the year, and is not based on the number of persons utilizing goods or services specified in Section 650.01.

(e) A licensee compensated or employed by a university may refer a person for a physician service, to any facility owned or operated by the university, or to another licensee employed by the university, provided that the facility or university does not compensate the referring licensee for the patient referral. In the case of a facility that is totally or partially owned by an entity other than the university, but that is staffed by university physicians, those physicians may not refer patients to the facility if the facility compensates the referring physicians for those referrals.

(f) The prohibition of Section 650.01 shall not apply to any service for a specific patient that is performed within, or goods that are supplied by, a licensee’s office, or the office of a group practice. Further, the provisions of Section 650.01 shall not alter, limit, or expand a licensee’s ability to deliver, or to direct or supervise the delivery of, in-office goods or services according to the laws, rules, and regulations governing his or her scope of practice.

(g) The prohibition of Section 650.01 shall not apply to cardiac rehabilitation services provided by a licensee or by a suitably trained individual under the direct or general supervision of a licensee, if the services are provided to patients meeting the criteria for Medicare reimbursement for the services.

(h) The prohibition of Section 650.01 shall not apply if a licensee is in the office of a group practice and refers a person for services or goods specified in Section 650.01 to a multispecialty clinic, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) The prohibition of Section 650.01 shall not apply to health care services provided to an enrollee of a health care service plan licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(j) The prohibition of Section 650.01 shall not apply to a request by a pathologist for clinical diagnostic laboratory tests and pathological examination services, a request by a radiologist for diagnostic radiology services, or a request by a radiation oncologist for radiation therapy if those services are furnished by, or under the supervision of, the pathologist, radiologist, or radiation oncologist pursuant to a consultation requested by another physician.

(k) This section shall not apply to referrals for services that are described in and covered by Sections 139.3 and 139.31 of the Labor Code.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

650.1.

(a) Any amount payable to any hospital, as defined in Section 4028, or any person or corporation prohibited from pharmacy permit ownership by subdivision (a) of Section 4111 under any rental, lease or service arrangement with respect to the furnishing or supply of pharmaceutical services and products, which is determined as a percentage, fraction, or portion of (1) the charges to patients or of (2) any measure of hospital or pharmacy revenue or cost, for pharmaceuticals and pharmaceutical services is prohibited.

(b) Any lease or rental arrangement existing on the effective date of this section shall be in full compliance with subdivision (a) by January 1, 1986.

(c) Any lease or rental agreement entered into prior to January 1, 1980, that extends beyond the effective date of this section shall be construed to be in compliance with this section until its expiration or the expiration of any option which is contained in any such lease or rental agreement provided that the lease or rental agreement contains provisions which limit pharmacy charges to the amounts not in excess of the prevailing charges in similar hospitals in the general geographic area.

(d) The California State Board of Pharmacy, the Medical Board of California, and the State Department of Health Services shall enforce this section and may require information from any person as is necessary for the enforcement of this section. It shall be the duty of the licensees of the respective regulatory agencies to produce the requisite evidence to show compliance with this section. Violations of this section shall be deemed to be the mutual responsibility of both lessee and lessor, and shall be grounds for disciplinary action or other sanctions against both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 836, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

650.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 650 or any other provision of law, it shall not be unlawful for a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 or any other person, to participate in or operate a group advertising and referral service for dentists if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The patient referrals by the service result from patient-initiated responses to service advertising.

(2) The service advertises, if at all, in conformity with Section 651 and subdivisions (i) and (l) of Section 1680.

(3) The
 service does not employ a solicitor within the meaning of subdivision (j) of Section 1680.

(4) The service does not impose a fee on the member dentists dependent upon the number of referrals or amount of professional fees paid by the patient to the dentist.

(5) Participating dentists charge no more than their usual and customary fees to any patient referred.

(6) The service registers with the Dental Board of California, providing its name and address.

(7) The service files with the Dental Board of California a copy of the standard form contract that regulates its relationship with member dentists, which contract shall be confidential and not open to public inspection.

(8) If more than 50
 percent of its referrals are made to one individual, association, partnership, corporation, or group of three or more dentists, the service discloses that fact in all public communications, including, but not limited to, communication by means of television, radio, motion picture, newspaper, book, or list or directory of healing arts practitioners.

(9) When member dentists pay any fee to the service, any advertisement by the service shall clearly and conspicuously disclose that fact by including a statement as follows: “Paid for by participating dentists.” In print advertisements, the required statement shall be in at least 9-point type. In radio advertisements, the required statement shall be articulated so as to be clearly audible and understandable by the radio audience. In television advertisements, the required statement shall be either clearly audible and understandable to the television audience, or displayed in a written form that
 remains clearly visible for at least five seconds to the television audience. This subdivision shall be operative on and after July 1, 1994.

 (b) The Dental Board of California may adopt regulations necessary to enforce and administer this section.

 (c) The Dental Board of California may suspend or revoke the registration of any service that fails to comply with paragraph (9) of subdivision (a). No service may reregister with the board if it has a registration that is currently under suspension for a violation of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a), nor may a service reregister with the board if it had a registration revoked by the board for a violation of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) less than one year after that revocation.

(d) The Dental Board of California may petition the superior court of any county for the
 issuance of an injunction restraining any conduct that constitutes a violation of this section.

(e) It is unlawful and shall constitute a misdemeanor for a person to operate a group advertising and referral service for dentists without providing its name and address to the Dental Board of California.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section not to otherwise affect the prohibitions provided in Section 650. The Legislature intends to allow the pooling of resources by dentists for the purposes of advertising.

 (g) This section shall not be construed to authorize a referral service to engage in the practice of dentistry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 4.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

650.3.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 650 or any other provision of law, it shall not be unlawful for a person licensed pursuant to the Chiropractic Act, or any other person, to participate in or operate a group advertising and referral service for chiropractors if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Patient referrals by the service are the result of patient initiated responses to service advertising.

(2) The service advertises, if at all, in conformity with Section 651.

(3) The service does not employ a solicitor.

(4) The service does not impose a fee on the member chiropractors that is dependent upon the number of referrals or amount of professional fees paid by the patient to the chiropractor.

(5) Participating chiropractors charge no more than their usual and customary fees to any patient referred.

(6) The service registers with the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, providing its name and address.

(7) The service files with the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners a copy of the standard form contract that regulates its relationship with member chiropractors, which contract shall be confidential and not open to public inspection.

(8) If more than 50 percent of its referrals are made to one individual, association, partnership, corporation, or group of three or more chiropractors, the service discloses that fact in all public communications, including, but not limited to, communication by means of television, radio, motion picture, newspaper, book, or list or directory of healing arts practitioners.

(b) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners may adopt regulations necessary to enforce and administer this section.

(c) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners or 10 individual licensed chiropractors may petition the superior court of any county for the issuance of an injunction restraining any conduct which constitutes a violation of this section.

(d) It is unlawful and shall constitute a misdemeanor for a person to operate a group advertising and referral service for chiropractors without providing its name and address to the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section not to otherwise affect the prohibitions provided in Section 650. The Legislature intends to allow the pooling of resources by chiropractors for the purpose of advertising.

(f) This section shall not be construed in any manner which would authorize a service to engage in the practice of chiropractic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 856, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

(a) It is unlawful for any person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division to disseminate or cause to be disseminated any form of public communication containing a false, fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive statement, claim, or image for the purpose of or likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the rendering of professional services or furnishing of products in connection with the professional practice or business for which he or she is licensed. A “public communication” as used in this section includes, but is not limited to, communication by means of mail, television, radio, motion picture, newspaper, book, list or directory of healing arts practitioners, Internet, or other electronic
 communication.

(b) A false, fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive statement, claim, or image includes a statement or claim that does any of the following:

(1) Contains a misrepresentation of fact.

(2) Is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts.

(3) (A) Is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, including the use of any photograph or other image that does not accurately depict the results of the procedure being advertised or that has been altered in any manner from the image of the actual subject depicted in the photograph or image.

(B) Use of any photograph or other image of a model without clearly stating in a prominent location in easily readable type the fact that the photograph or image is of a model is a violation of subdivision (a). For purposes of this paragraph, a model is anyone other than an actual patient, who has undergone the procedure being advertised, of the licensee who is advertising for his or her services.

(C) Use of any photograph or other image of an actual patient that depicts or purports to depict the results of any procedure, or presents “before” and “after” views of a patient, without specifying in a prominent location in easily readable type size what procedures were performed on that patient is a violation of subdivision (a). Any “before” and “after” views (i) shall be comparable in
 presentation so that the results are not distorted by favorable poses, lighting, or other features of presentation, and (ii) shall contain a statement that the same “before” and “after” results may not occur for all patients.

(4) Relates to fees, other than a standard consultation fee or a range of fees for specific types of services, without fully and specifically disclosing all variables and other material factors.

(5) Contains other representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived.

(6) Makes a claim either of professional superiority or of performing services in a superior manner, unless that claim is relevant to the service
 being performed and can be substantiated with objective scientific evidence.

(7) Makes a scientific claim that cannot be substantiated by reliable, peer reviewed, published scientific studies.

(8) Includes any statement, endorsement, or testimonial that is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts.

(c) Any price advertisement shall be exact, without the use of phrases, including, but not limited to, “as low as,” “and up,” “lowest prices,” or words or phrases of similar import. Any advertisement that refers to services, or costs for services, and that uses words of comparison shall be based on verifiable data substantiating the comparison. Any person so advertising shall be prepared
 to provide information sufficient to establish the accuracy of that comparison. Price advertising shall not be fraudulent, deceitful, or misleading, including statements or advertisements of bait, discount, premiums, gifts, or any statements of a similar nature. In connection with price advertising, the price for each product or service shall be clearly identifiable. The price advertised for products shall include charges for any related professional services, including dispensing and fitting services, unless the advertisement specifically and clearly indicates otherwise.

(d) Any person so licensed shall not compensate or give anything of value to a representative of the press, radio, television, or other communication medium in anticipation of, or in return for, professional publicity unless the fact of compensation is made known in that
 publicity.

(e) Any person so licensed may not use any professional card, professional announcement card, office sign, letterhead, telephone directory listing, medical list, medical directory listing, or a similar professional notice or device if it includes a statement or claim that is false, fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive within the meaning of subdivision (b).

(f) Any person so licensed who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. A bona fide mistake of fact shall be a defense to this subdivision, but only to this subdivision.

(g) Any violation of this section by a person so licensed shall constitute good cause for revocation or suspension of his or her license or other disciplinary action.

(h) Advertising by any person so licensed may include the following:

(1) A statement of the name of the practitioner.

(2) A statement of addresses and telephone numbers of the offices maintained by the practitioner.

(3) A statement of office hours regularly maintained by the practitioner.

(4) A statement of languages, other than English, fluently spoken by the practitioner or a person in the practitioner’s office.

(5) (A) A statement that the practitioner is certified by a private or public board or agency or a statement
 that the practitioner limits his or her practice to specific fields.

(B) A statement of certification by a practitioner licensed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000) shall only include a statement that he or she is certified or eligible for certification by a private or public board or parent association recognized by that practitioner’s licensing board.

(C) A physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) by the Medical Board of California may include a statement that he or she limits his or her practice to specific fields, but shall not include a statement that he or she is certified or eligible for certification by a private or public board or parent association, including, but not limited to, a multidisciplinary board or association,
 unless that board or association is (i) an American Board of Medical Specialties member board, (ii) a board or association with equivalent requirements approved by that physician’s and surgeon’s licensing board prior to January 1, 2019, or (iii) a board or association with an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education approved postgraduate training program that provides complete training in that specialty or subspecialty. A physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) by the Medical Board of California who is certified by an organization other than a board or association referred to in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) shall not use the term “board certified” in reference to that certification, unless the physician and surgeon is also licensed under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) and the use of the term “board certified” in reference to that
 certification is in accordance with subparagraph (A). A physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) by the Medical Board of California who is certified by a board or association referred to in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) shall not use the term “board certified” unless the full name of the certifying board is also used and given comparable prominence with the term “board certified” in the statement.

For purposes of this subparagraph, a “multidisciplinary board or association” means an educational certifying body that has a psychometrically valid testing process, as determined by the Medical Board of California, for certifying medical doctors and other health care professionals that is based on the applicant’s education, training, and experience. A multidisciplinary board or association approved by the Medical Board of
 California prior to January 1, 2019, shall retain that approval.

For purposes of the term “board certified,” as used in this subparagraph, the terms “board” and “association” mean an organization that is an American Board of Medical Specialties member board, an organization with equivalent requirements approved by a physician’s and surgeon’s licensing board prior to January 1, 2019, or an organization with an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education approved postgraduate training program that provides complete training in a specialty or subspecialty.

(D) A doctor of podiatric medicine licensed under Article 22 (commencing with Section 2460) of Chapter 5 by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine may include a statement that he or she is certified or eligible or qualified for
 certification by a private or public board or parent association, including, but not limited to, a multidisciplinary board or association, if that board or association meets one of the following requirements: (i) is approved
 by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education, (ii) is a board or association with equivalent requirements approved by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or (iii) is a board or association with the Council on Podiatric Medical Education approved postgraduate training programs that provide training in podiatric medicine and podiatric surgery. A doctor of podiatric medicine licensed under Article 22 (commencing with Section 2460) of Chapter 5 by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine who is certified by a board or association referred to in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) shall not use the term “board certified” unless the full name of the certifying board is also used and given comparable prominence with the term “board certified” in the statement. A doctor of podiatric medicine licensed under Article 22 (commencing with Section 2460) of Chapter 5 by the California Board
 of Podiatric Medicine who is certified by an organization other than a board or association referred to in clause (i), (ii), or
 (iii) shall not use the term “board certified” in reference to that certification.

For purposes of this subparagraph, a “multidisciplinary board or association” means an educational certifying body that has a psychometrically valid testing process, as determined by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, for certifying doctors of podiatric medicine that is based on the applicant’s education, training, and experience. For purposes of the term “board certified,” as used in this subparagraph, the terms “board” and “association” mean an organization that is a Council on Podiatric Medical Education approved board, an organization with equivalent requirements approved by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or an organization with a Council on Podiatric Medical Education approved postgraduate training program that provides training in
 podiatric medicine and podiatric surgery.

The California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall adopt regulations to establish and collect a reasonable fee from each board or association applying for recognition pursuant to this subparagraph, to be deposited in the State Treasury in the Podiatry Fund, pursuant to Section 2499. The fee shall not exceed the cost of administering this subparagraph.

(6) A statement that the practitioner provides services under a specified private or public insurance plan or health care plan.

(7) A statement of names of schools and postgraduate clinical training programs from which the practitioner has graduated, together with the degrees received.

(8) A
 statement of publications authored by the practitioner.

(9) A statement of teaching positions currently or formerly held by the practitioner, together with pertinent dates.

(10) A statement of his or her affiliations with hospitals or clinics.

(11) A statement of the charges or fees for services or commodities offered by the practitioner.

(12) A statement that the practitioner regularly accepts installment payments of fees.

(13) Otherwise lawful images of a practitioner, his or her physical facilities, or of a commodity to be advertised.

(14) A statement of the manufacturer, designer, style, make, trade name, brand name, color, size, or type of commodities advertised.

(15) An advertisement of a registered dispensing optician may include statements in addition to those specified in paragraphs (1) to (14), inclusive, provided that any statement shall not violate subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (e) or any other section of this code.

(16) A statement, or statements, providing public health information encouraging preventive or corrective care.

(17) Any other item of factual information that is not false, fraudulent, misleading, or likely to deceive.

(i) Each of the healing arts boards and examining
 committees within Division 2 shall adopt appropriate regulations to enforce this section in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Each of the healing arts boards and committees and examining committees within Division 2 shall, by regulation, define those efficacious services to be advertised by businesses or professions under their jurisdiction for the purpose of determining whether advertisements are false or misleading. Until a definition for that service has been issued, no advertisement for that service shall be disseminated. However, if a definition of a service has not been issued by a board or committee within 120 days of receipt of a request from a licensee, all those holding the license may advertise the service. Those boards and committees shall adopt or modify
 regulations defining what services may be advertised, the manner in which defined services may be advertised, and restricting advertising that would promote the inappropriate or excessive use of health services or commodities. A board or committee shall not, by regulation, unreasonably prevent truthful, nondeceptive price or otherwise lawful forms of advertising of services or commodities, by either outright prohibition or imposition of onerous disclosure requirements. However, any member of a board or committee acting in good faith in the adoption or enforcement of any regulation shall be deemed to be acting as an agent of the state.

(j) The Attorney General shall commence legal proceedings in the appropriate forum to enjoin advertisements disseminated or about to be disseminated in violation of this section and seek other appropriate
 relief to enforce this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the costs of enforcing this section to the respective licensing boards or committees may be awarded against any licensee found to be in violation of any provision of this section. This shall not diminish the power of district attorneys, county counsels, or city attorneys pursuant to existing law to seek appropriate relief.

(k) A physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) by the Medical Board of California or a doctor of podiatric medicine licensed pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 2460) of Chapter 5 by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine who knowingly and intentionally violates this section may be cited and assessed an administrative fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per event. Section 125.9
 shall govern the issuance of this citation and fine except that the fine limitations prescribed in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9 shall not apply to a fine under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 6.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

651.3.

(a) Any labor organization, bona fide employee group or bona fide employee association having contracted health care services from a health care service plan under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (commencing with Section 1340 of the Health and Safety Code) may inform its members as to the benefits available and the charges therefor.

(b) Any new or revised written advertising or solicitation, or any form of evidence of coverage adopted by a health care service plan under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (commencing with Section 1340 of the Health and Safety Code) for distribution to members pursuant to subdivision (a) shall comply with the provisions of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 and the regulations thereunder.

(c) Any labor organization, bona fide employee group or bona fide employee association, contracting for a health care service plan under this section, shall not derive any profit from such plan.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as authorizing a provider of medical assistance, including a prepaid health plan, under the Medi-Cal Act or the Waxman-Duffy Prepaid Health Plan Act to advertise in violation of any of the provisions of such acts and regulations developed thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

652.

Violation of this article in the case of a licensed person constitutes unprofessional conduct and grounds for suspension or revocation of his or her license by the board by whom he or she is licensed, or if a license has been issued in connection with a place of business, then for the suspension or revocation of the place of business in connection with which the violation occurs. The proceedings for suspension or revocation shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and each board shall have all the powers granted therein. However, in the case of a licensee of the State Department of Health Services, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Section 110171 of the Health and Safety Code. In addition, any violation constitutes a misdemeanor as to any and all persons offering, delivering, receiving, accepting, or participating in any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage dividend, unearned discount, or consideration, whether or not licensed under this division, and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both the imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 220, Sec. 3.   Effective August 4, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

652.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any violation of this article constitutes a misdemeanor as to any and all persons, whether or not licensed under this division, and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both the imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1206, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

653.

The word “person” as used in this article includes an individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or cooperative association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

654.

No person licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of this division may have any membership, proprietary interest or coownership in any form in or with any person licensed under Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550) of this division to whom patients, clients or customers are referred or any profit-sharing arrangements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 688.)
-------------------------------------------

654.1.

Persons licensed under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of this division or licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of this division or licensed under any initiative act referred to in this division relating to osteopaths may not refer patients, clients, or customers to any clinical laboratory licensed under Section 1265 in which the licensee has any membership, proprietary interest, or coownership in any form, or has any profit-sharing arrangement, unless the licensee at the time of making such referral discloses in writing such interest to the patient, client, or customer. The written disclosure shall indicate that the patient may choose any clinical laboratory for purposes of having any laboratory work or assignment performed.

This section shall not apply to persons who are members of a medical group which contracts to provide medical care to members of a group practice prepayment plan registered under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Act of 1975, Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

This section shall not apply to any referral to a clinical laboratory which is owned and operated by a health facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.
